Utah statutes.
77-2-2.   Definitions.
For the purpose of this chapter:
(1)  "Screening" means the process used by a prosecuting attorney to terminate
investigative action, proceed with prosecution, move to dismiss a prosecution
that has been commenced, or cause a prosecution to be diverted;
(2)  "Diversion" means suspending criminal proceedings prior to conviction on
the condition that a defendant agree to participate in a rehabilitation
program or make restitution to the victim or fulfill some other condition; and
(3)  "Commencement of prosecution" means the filing of an information or an
indictment.
